Utah statutes.
62A-5-207.   Superintendent -- Qualifications.
The superintendent of the developmental center, appointed in accordance with
Subsection 62A-5-104 (4), shall have a bachelor's degree from an accredited
university or college, be experienced in administration, and be knowledgeable
in developmental disabilities and mental retardation.
